vi: Kiểu khớp nối: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Đạn; Tháo lắp nhanh; Hình tia; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Tóc xoăn gợn sóng; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta spojnice: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; U obliku metka; Brzo otpuštanje; Radijalan; Speed-Loc; True-Loc; Uni-Loc; Valoviti; Ostalo
en: Joint style: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Bullet; Quick release; Radial; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Wavy; Other
pl: Styl połączenia: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; jednorazowo; Szybkozamykacz; Promieniowe; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Falista; Pozostałe
sk-SK: Štýl spoja: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Guľka; Rýchle uvoľnenie; Radiálny; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Vlnitý; Iné
fr: Style de joint: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Balle; Relâchement rapide; Radial; Localisation rapide; Vrai-loc; Uni-loc; Ondulé; Autre
da: Ledstil: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Kugle; Hurtig udløsning; Radial; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Bølget; Andet
zh-TW: 接頭樣式: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; 子彈; 快拆; 徑向; 快速鎖定; True-loc; Uni-loc; 波浪式; 其他
es: Estilo de junta: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Viñeta; Liberación rápida; Radial; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Ondulado; Otros
de: Verbindungsstückstil: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Kugel; Schnellverschluss; Radial; Speed-Loc; True-Loc; Uni-Loc; Wellig; Sonstiges
tr: Birleşim Stili: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Kurşun; Hızlı açılır; Radyal; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Dalgalı; Diğer
zh-CN: 接头款式: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; 子弹; 快拆装置; 径向; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; 波浪滑道; 其他
sl-SI: Slog spoja: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Krogelni; Hitra sprostitev; Radialni; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Valovit; Drugo
nb: Skjøtestil: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Kule; Hurtigutløser; Radial; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Bølgete; Annen
ko: 조인트 스타일: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; 불릿; 퀵 릴리스; 방사형; 스피드록; 트루록; 유니록; 웨이브; 기타
nl: Verbindingsstijl: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Bullet; Snelle ontkoppeling; Radiaal; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Golf; Andere
ru: Тип скрутки: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Заклепка; Быстросъемный; Радиальный; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Волнистый; Другое
pt-PT: Estilo de junta: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Ponto; Mecanismo de libertação rápida; Radial; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Ondulado; Outro
cs: Styl chrániče závitů: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Kulová; Rychloupínací; Radiální; Speed-Loc; True-Loc; Uni-Loc; Vlnité; Jiné
bg-BG: Стил на съединителната скоба: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Куршум; Бързо освобождаване; Радиална; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Вълнообразен; Други
it: Tipo di giunzione: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Proiettile; Sgancio rapido; Radiale; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Mossi; Altro
ja: ジョイントスタイル: 1/2x13; 3/8x10; 3/8x11; 3/8x14; 3/8x8; 5/16x11; 5/16x12; 5/16x14; 5/16x18; 弾丸; クイックリリース; ラジアル; スピードロック; トゥルーロック; ユニロック; ウェーブのかかった; その他
fi: Liitostyyli: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Luoti; Pikavapautus; Säteittäinen; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Aaltoilevat; Muu
ro-RO: Stil îmbinare: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; De tip glonț; Eliberare rapidă; Radială; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Ondulată; Altele
sv: Ledstil: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Kula; Snabbkoppling; Radiell; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Vågigt; Annat
pt-BR: Estilo conjunto: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Marcador; Desengate rápido; Radial; Locação rápida; True-loc; Uni-loc; Ondulado; Outro
th: สไตล์ร่วม: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; กระสุน; เพลทฐานแบบติดตั้งรวดเร็ว; แบบรัศมี; ข้อต่อ Speed-loc; ข้อต่อ True-loc; ข้อต่อ Uni-loc; แบบลอน; อื่นๆ
el: Στυλ ένωσης: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Με σχήμα μυτερού κώνου; Γρήγορη αποδέσμευση; Ακτινωτό; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Κυματιστά; Άλλο
lt-LT: Movos tipas: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Kulkos formos; Greitai atsegama; Radialinė; „Speed-loc“; „True-loc“; „Uni-loc“; Banguota; Kita
hu: Csatlakozó stílusa: 1/2 x 13; 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 11; 3/8 x 14; 3/8 x 8; 5/16 x 11; 5/16 x 12; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; Golyós; Gyorskioldó; Radiális; Speed-loc; True-loc; Uni-loc; Hullámos; Egyéb